New Mexico, session 2026, SB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 7-13-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1971, Chapter 207, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read: "7-13-3. IMPOSITION AND RATE OF TAX--DENOMINATION AS "GASOLINE TAX".-- A. For the privilege of receiving gasoline in this state, there is imposed an excise tax at a rate provided in Subsection B of this section on each gallon of gasoline received in New Mexico. B. The tax imposed by Subsection A of this section shall be [seventeen cents ($.17)] twenty cents ($.20) per gallon received in New Mexico. C. The tax imposed by this section may be called the "gasoline tax"." SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 2 -